Utah statutes.
75-6-114.   Financial institution protection -- Costs and attorneys' fees.

A financial institution shall have a lien for its costs and attorneys' fees on the sums on deposit in any multiple-party account in such institution which becomes the subject of any litigation as to the rights to such sums. This lien shall attach only if the financial institution acted in good faith and with good cause.

